Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 2. Administrative Procedures to Enforce Rules and Regulations of Board of Animal Health.

§ 69-15-51.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of Sections 69-15-51 through 69-15-69 to establish an administrative hearing procedure under the Board of Animal Health to enforce the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health and the statutes and laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the control and eradication of tuberculosis, anthrax, hog cholera, Texas and splenic fever and the fever-carrying tick (Margaropus annulatus), cattle brucellosis, anaplasmosis, infectious bovine rhinotracheitis, muscosal disease, cattle viral diarrhea, cattle scabies, sheep scabies, swine erysipelas, swine brucellosis, equine encephalomyelitis, rabies, vesicular diseases, salmonella group, newcastle disease, infectious laryngotracheitis, ornithosis-psittacosis, mycoplasma group, equine infectious anemia and any suspected new and/or foreign diseases of livestock and poultry, and all other diseases of animals in this state, currently in effect or hereafter made and promulgated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-53.
Procedure following charge of violation; reviewing officer.

When any allegation or charge has been made against a person for violating the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health or the law relating to the prevention and eradication of diseases in animals and livestock, the Board of Animal Health shall direct the State Veterinarian to act as the reviewing officer. The reviewing officer shall (a) cause the complaint to be in writing and signed by the person making the charge; (b) insure that the complaint is filed in the office of the Board of Animal Health; and (c) send a copy of the complaint and any supporting documents to the person accused along with a request for the accused to respond to the allegations within thirty (30) days. Such notification shall be accomplished by any of the methods provided for in Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. Upon receipt of the response and any supporting documents from the accused, the reviewing officer shall screen all information on file to determine the merit of the complaint or lack thereof.

If the reviewing officer determines that the complaint lacks merit, he may dismiss the complaint.

If the reviewing officer determines that there are reasonable grounds to indicate that a violation has occurred or the accused admits to the truth of the allegations upon which the complaint is based, the reviewing officer may levy a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.

If the accused requests a hearing, in writing, within thirty (30) days, the reviewing officer shall notify the Board of Animal Health and a hearing shall be scheduled. The actions of the State Veterinarian with respect to subsections (2) and (3) above shall be reviewable at such hearing, if so requested. The party requesting a hearing shall file a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) along with the request for hearing to cover the cost of a court reporter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 519, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 69-15-55.
Hearing committee; hearing procedure.

The Board of Animal Health, upon notice from the reviewing officer that a hearing is requested, shall appoint a three-member hearing committee which shall consist of one (1) attorney from the Attorney General’s office, and two (2) representatives from the Department of Agriculture or from the membership of the Board of Animal Health. The hearing committee shall, within thirty (30) days of notification from the reviewing officer, conduct a hearing at a date, time and place to be determined by the hearing committee, provided that such hearing shall be held and conducted within the county in which the accused resides or in a situs mutually agreeable and that for good cause shown the hearing committee may grant a continuance or continuances of such hearings. Written notice of date, time and place of such hearing shall be mailed to the accused by registered mail, return receipt requested, no less than fifteen (15) days prior to the commencing of the hearing.

A duly qualified court reporter shall be in attendance and shall make a full and complete transcript of the proceedings. The hearing shall be closed unless the accused shall request a public hearing. The hearing committee shall have the right and duty to impose reasonable restrictions as it may deem necessary or appropriate to insure an orderly, expeditious and impartial proceeding, and shall admit all relevant and material evidence except evidence which is unduly repetitious.

For purposes of such hearing, the committee is hereby empowered to require the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths and hear testimony, either oral or documentary, for and against the accused. The board shall have the authority to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records or other documentary evidence at a hearing pending before the board. Subpoenas to be issued shall be delivered to the sheriff of the county where they are to be executed and the sheriff shall cause them to be served. In case of the failure of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by the board, the board or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of general jurisdiction of this state. The court may thereupon order such person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena. Failure to comply with the order of the court may be treated as contempt thereof.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing committee, upon the majority vote of the members of such committee, shall transmit to the Board of Animal Health a written opinion incorporating findings of fact and recommendations for penalties which shall not exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-57.
Certification of findings and recommendations to Board of Animal Health.

The reviewing officer and/or the hearing committee shall certify findings and recommendations to the Board of Animal Health within five (5) days of the conclusion of the proceedings. The Board of Animal Health shall, at its next regular meeting, review such findings and recommendations and approve, modify or reverse the recommendations made as a result of the review and hearing. The Board of Animal Health shall then notify the accused violator of its decision by certified mail at a mailing address provided during the proceedings, or at the accused violator’s last-known address.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-59.
Waiver of right to hearing.

Failure of the accused to request a hearing or respond to the complaint within thirty (30) days shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing and any penalties assessed by the board shall be due and payable as provided in Section 69-15-67.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-61.
Jurisdiction of Board of Animal Health; authority to adopt rules and regulations.

The Board of Animal Health shall have jurisdiction over all persons and property necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of Sections 69-15-51 through 69-15-69, the rules and regulations of the board, and all other laws relating to the prevention and eradication of diseases in animals and livestock. The board may adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of Sections 69-15-51 through 69-15-69.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-63.
Judicial review.

Any individual aggrieved by a final decision of the Board of Animal Health after its review of the hearing officer’s recommendation shall be entitled to judicial review.

An appeal from the board’s decision shall be filed in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County on the record made, including a verbatim transcript of the testimony at the hearing held before the designated hearing committee of the Board of Animal Health. The appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days after notification of the action of the board is mailed or served and the proceedings in circuit court shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court. The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of preparation of the record of the proceedings by the Board of Animal Health, and the filing of a bond in the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) conditioned that if the action of the board be affirmed by the circuit court, the aggrieved party shall pay the costs of the appeal and the action of the circuit court.

The scope of review of the circuit court in such cases shall be limited to a review of the record made before the board or hearing committee to determine if the action of the board is unlawful for the reason that it was:

Not supported by any substantial evidence;

Arbitrary or capricious; or

In violation of some statutory or constitutional right of the individual.

No relief shall be granted based upon the court’s finding of harmless error by the board in complying with the procedural requirements of Sections 69-15-51 through 69-15-61. In the event that there is a finding of prejudicial error in the proceedings, the cause may be remanded for a rehearing consistent with the findings of the court.

Any party aggrieved by action of the circuit court may appeal to the State Supreme Court in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-65.
Penalties.

Each violation of the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health or violations of any other of the laws governing the eradication of contagious diseases in animals and livestock shall be subject to the imposition of a civil penalty up to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

When one or more animals are involved and are the subject of the violation each animal shall constitute a separate violation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-67.
Failure to pay penalty.

Any penalty assessed by the Board of Animal Health shall be due and payable within forty-five (45) days of the notification of the board’s decision.

In the event that the judgment is not paid within the forty-five (45) days, or within such additional time as the board may allow, the Board of Animal Health through its designated representative may file suit in the circuit court of the county where the defendant resides or in the case of a nonresident defendant in the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or any other court with appropriate jurisdiction to enforce the decision of the board and recover reasonable attorney’s fees and all court costs.

A copy of the notification sent by the board to the violator shall be sufficient proof as to the judgment of the board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-69.
Immunity for witnesses.

No person shall be subject to criminal prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or issue concerning which he may be required to testify to or produce evidence, or provide documentation, before the board or at any of its hearings or conferences, or in compliance with any subpoena, however, no person testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).